New York, session 2025-2026, S1285.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Tiarah 2 Poyau Act". 3 § 2. Section 310.30 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by chap- 4 ter 208 of the laws of 1980, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 310.30 Jury deliberation; request for information. 6 At any time during its deliberation, the jury may request the court 7 for further instruction or information with respect to the law, with 8 respect to the content or substance of any trial evidence, or with 9 respect to any other matter pertinent to the jury's consideration of the 10 case. Upon such a request, the court must direct that the jury be 11 returned to the courtroom and, after notice to both the people and coun- 12 sel for the defendant, and in the presence of the defendant, must give 13 such requested information or instruction as the court deems proper. 14 With the consent of the parties and upon the request of the jury for 15 further instruction with respect to a statute, the court may also give 16 to the jury copies of the text of any statute which, in its discretion, 17 the court deems proper. In addition, where the jury requests written 18 instructions regarding the elements of any offense submitted, or of any 19 defense or affirmative defense submitted in relation thereto, the court 20 may provide the jury with such written instructions as the jury has 21 requested and any other written instruction relevant to the instructions 22 requested by the jury that the court deems proper. Before giving to the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00079-03-5 S. 1285--A 2 1 jury such written instructions regarding the elements of any offense or 2 of any defense or affirmative defense pursuant to this section, the 3 court shall permit counsel to examine such written instructions, shall 4 afford counsel an opportunity to be heard, shall mark such written 5 instructions as a court exhibit and shall read the instructions to the 6 jury. 7 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 8 it shall have become a law.